District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.15

File of hearing decisions.

The Mayor will maintain a file of all hearing decisions, with identifying information deleted, that will be accessible to claimants, their representatives, and other persons upon request to the Mayor.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1015, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-210.15.